District of Columbia statutes.
23-1307

Annual reports.

The Director shall each year submit to the executive committee and to the Director of the Court Services and Offender Supervision Agency for the District of Columbia a report as to the Pretrial Services Agency’s administration of its responsibilities for the previous fiscal year. The Director shall include in the report a statement of financial condition, revenues, and expenses for the past fiscal year.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 642, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 7(g), 35 DCR 147
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 761, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11271(a)
Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2427 Pub. L. 105-274, § 7(c)(2)(D)
1981 Ed., § 23-1307.
1973 Ed., § 23-1307.